Nebraska, session 109, LB1154.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1154 LB1154
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 13-3403, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
13-3403 (1) Except as otherwise provided in the Property Tax Growth
Limitation Act, for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025, a
political subdivision's property tax request for any year shall not
exceed its property tax request authority as determined under this
section. The preliminary property tax request authority for each
political subdivision shall be the amount of property taxes requested and
approved by each political subdivision and included on the budget
document filed with the auditor in the prior fiscal year pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 13-506, less the sum of exceptions utilized in
the prior year pursuant to subdivisions (1), (2), (4), (5), (6), and to
(7) of section 13-3404.
(2) In addition to the preliminary property tax request authority,
the political subdivision's property tax request authority may be
increased by:
(a) The product of (i) the amount of property taxes levied in the
prior year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year
pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404, and (ii) the
political subdivision's growth percentage; and
(b) The product of (i) the amount of property taxes levied in the
prior year, less the sum of exceptions utilized in the prior year
pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 13-3404, and (ii) the
greater of zero or the inflation percentage.
Sec. 2. Original section 13-3403, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-2-